Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4332
Bonds; issuance; consent not required.

Bonds may be issued under the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or instrumentality of this state and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act, and the validity of and security for any bonds shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any such consent or other proceedings, conditions, or things.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 32.